Florida, session 2026, SB1000.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 655.98, Florida Statutes, is created to 15 read: 16 655.98âLawyer or law firm trust account interest rates.âA 17 financial institution may hold funds in an interest-bearing 18 trust account of a lawyer or law firm in which the institution 19 remits interest or dividends on the balance of the deposited 20 funds to an entity established by the Supreme Court. Such entity 21 shall use the interest or dividends to provide or facilitate the 22 provision of free legal services to low-income individuals or 23 for such other purposes as may be expressly authorized by rule 24 of the Supreme Court. If the financial institution holds such an 25 account, it must pay, net of all fees and charges assessed by 26 the financial institution, interest or dividends at the Wall 27 Street Journal prime rate in effect on the first business day of 28 each month, less 300 basis points, with a floor of 0.25 percent 29 and a ceiling of 1.5 percent. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.